Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,142
Summer Food
Service Program; department; collect data; report.

The
department shall collect data regarding the number of sponsors, the number
of sites utilized by sponsors, and the number of children served as a result
of the grants awarded under section 79-10,141. The department shall submit
a report electronically to
the Education Committee of the Legislature on this data not later than December
1 each year.

Laws 2012, LB1090, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 34.